es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Medicinas y medicamentos: Medicamentos para alergia y fiebre del heno; Medicamentos para tos, resfriado y gripe; Medicamentos para la salud digestiva; Analgésicos y reductores de fiebre; Ayudas para dormir y relajantes; Ayudas para dejar de fumar; Tratamientos tópicos para la piel
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 處方/非處方藥物: 過敏及花粉熱藥物; 咳嗽、感冒及流感藥物; 消化健康藥物; 止痛及退燒藥; 安眠及放鬆劑; 戒菸輔助用品; 局部皮膚治療
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Medicina in zdravila: Zdravila za alergije in seneni nahod; Zdravila za kašelj, prehlad in gripo; Zdravila za prebavno zdravje; Zdravila za lajšanje bolečin in znižanje vročine; Pomirjevala in pomožna sredstva za spanje; Pripomočki za opuščanje kajenja; Lokalna zdravljenja kože
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Dược phẩm và thuốc: Thuốc dị ứng và sốt cỏ khô; Thuốc ho, cảm lạnh và cúm; Thuốc tiêu hóa; Thuốc giảm đau và hạ sốt; Thuốc hỗ trợ giấc ngủ và thư giãn; Thuốc cai thuốc lá; Thuốc bôi da
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > ยา: ยาแก้แพ้และไข้ละอองฟาง; ยาแก้ไอ หวัด และไข้หวัดใหญ่; ยารักษาระบบทางเดินอาหาร; ยาแก้ปวดและลดไข้; ยานอนหลับและยาผ่อนคลาย; ผลิตภัณฑ์ช่วยเลิกบุหรี่; ยาทาภายนอก
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Медикаменты и лекарства: Лекарства от аллергии и поллиноза; Лекарства от кашля, простуды и гриппа; Препараты для пищеварения; Обезболивающие и жаропонижающие средства; Снотворные и расслабляющие средства; Средства для отказа от курения; Местные средства для лечения кожи
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Lääkkeet: Allergia- ja heinänuhalääke; Yskä-, nuha- ja flunssalääke; Ruoansulatuslääke; Kipulääke ja kuumelääke; Unilääke ja rauhoittava lääke; Tupakoinnin lopettamisapuväline; Iholle annettava lääke
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Medicine & Drugs: Allergy & Hay Fever Medicines; Cough, Cold & Flu Medicines; Digestive Health Medicines; Pain Relief & Fever Reducers; Sleep Aids & Relaxants; Smoking Cessation Aids; Topical Skin Treatments
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Fármacos e medicamentos: Medicamentos para alergias e febre dos fenos; Medicamentos para tosse, constipações e gripe; Medicamentos para saúde digestiva; Analgésicos e antitérmicos; Auxiliares de sono e relaxantes; Auxiliares para cessação tabágica; Tratamentos tópicos para a pele
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Medisiner og legemidler: Allergi- og høysnuemedisiner; Hoste-, forkjølelses- og influensamedisiner; Fordøyelsesmedisiner; Smertestillende og febernedsettende; Sovemidler og beroligende midler; Røykeslutthjelpemidler; Topiske hudbehandlinger
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Medicina e farmaci: Medicinali per allergie e febbre da fieno; Medicinali per tosse, raffreddore e influenza; Medicinali per la salute digestiva; Antidolorifici e antipiretici; Sonniferi e miorilassanti; Aiuti per smettere di fumare; Trattamenti topici per la pelle
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Medicijnen en geneesmiddelen: Allergie en hooikoorts medicijnen; Hoest, verkoudheid en griep medicijnen; Spijsvertering gezondheid medicijnen; Pijnverlichting en koortsverlagende middelen; Slaapmiddelen en kalmeringsmiddelen; Stoppen met roken hulpmiddelen; Topische huidbehandelingen
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Medicin og medicinalvarer: Allergi- og høfebermedicin; Hoste-, forkølelse- og influenzamedicin; Fordøjelsessundhedsmedicin; Smertestillende og febersænkende midler; Søvnmidler og beroligende midler; Rygestop-hjælpemidler; Topiske hudbehandlinger
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Lekarstwa: Leki na alergie i katar sienny; Leki na kaszel, przeziębienie i grypę; Leki na dolegliwości trawienne; Środki przeciwbólowe i przeciwgorączkowe; Środki nasenne i uspokajające; Środki wspomagające rzucanie palenia; Miejscowe preparaty lecznicze do skóry
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Léčivé přípravky a léky: Léky na alergie a sennou rýmu; Léky na kašel, nachlazení a chřipku; Léky na trávení; Léky proti bolesti a horečce; Pomocné prostředky na spaní a relaxaci; Pomůcky pro odvykání kouření; Topické kožní přípravky
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Medicamente: Medicamente pentru alergii și febra fânului; Medicamente pentru tuse, răceală și gripă; Medicamente pentru sănătatea digestivă; Analgezice și antipiretice; Somnifere și relaxante; Produse pentru renunțarea la fumat; Tratamente topice pentru piele
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Lieky: Lieky na alergie a sennú nádchu; Lieky na kašeľ, prechladnutie a chrípku; Lieky na tráviace ťažkosti; Lieky proti bolesti a na zníženie horúčky; Prípravky na spánok a uvoľnenie; Pomôcky na odvykanie od fajčenia; Topické prípravky na pokožku
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Lijekovi: Lijekovi za alergije i peludnu groznicu; Lijekovi za kašalj, prehladu i gripu; Lijekovi za probavu; Lijekovi protiv bolova i za snižavanje temperature; Pomagala za spavanje i relaksanti; Pomagala za prestanak pušenja; Lokalni tretmani za kožu
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 医薬品: アレルギー・花粉症薬; 咳・風邪・インフルエンザ薬; 消化器系薬; 鎮痛・解熱剤; 睡眠補助薬・リラックス薬; 禁煙補助薬; 外用皮膚治療薬
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > İlaçlar: Alerji ve Saman Nezlesi İlaçları; Öksürük, Soğuk Algınlığı ve Grip İlaçları; Sindirim Sağlığı İlaçları; Ağrı Kesici ve Ateş Düşürücüler; Uyku Yardımcıları ve Sakinleştiriciler; Sigara Bırakma Yardımcıları; Topikal Cilt Tedavileri
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 医疗/药品: 过敏和花粉症药物; 咳嗽、感冒和流感药物; 消化健康药物; 止痛药和退烧药; 助眠产品与放松用品; 戒烟辅助品; 外用皮肤治疗药
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Medicin och läkemedel: Allergi- och hösnuvamediciner; Host-, förkylnings- och influensamediciner; Mediciner för matsmältningshälsa; Smärtstillande och febersänkande; Sömnhjälpmedel och avslappnande medel; Rökavvänjningsmedel; Topikala hudbehandlingar
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 의약품: 알레르기 및 건초열 의약품; 기침, 감기 및 독감 의약품; 소화기 건강 의약품; 진통제 및 해열제; 수면 보조제 및 이완제; 금연 보조제; 국소 피부 치료제
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Medicina ir vaistai: Alergijos ir šienligės vaistai; Kosulio, peršalimo ir gripo vaistai; Virškinimo sveikatos vaistai; Skausmo malšinimo ir temperatūros mažinimo vaistai; Miego pagalbos priemonės ir atpalaiduojantys vaistai; Rūkymo metimo priemonės; Vietinio poveikio odos gydymo priemonės
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Medicamentos: Medicamentos para alergia e febre do feno; Medicamentos para tosse, resfriado e gripe; Medicamentos para saúde digestiva; Analgésicos e antitérmicos; Auxiliares de sono e relaxantes; Auxílios para parar de fumar; Tratamentos tópicos para a pele
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Médicaments: Médicaments contre les allergies et le rhume des foins; Médicaments contre la toux, le rhume et la grippe; Médicaments pour la santé digestive; Antidouleurs et antipyrétiques; Somnifères et relaxants; Aides au sevrage tabagique; Traitements topiques pour la peau
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Medikamente & Arzneimittel: Allergie- & Heuschnupfenmedikamente; Husten-, Erkältungs- & Grippemedikamente; Magen-Darm-Arzneimittel; Schmerzmittel & Fiebersenker; Schlafmittel & Beruhigungsmittel; Raucherentwöhnungshilfen; Topische Hautbehandlungen
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Φάρμακα & ναρκωτικές ουσίες: Φάρμακα αλλεργίας και αλλεργικής ρινίτιδας; Φάρμακα βήχα, κρυολογήματος και γρίπης; Φάρμακα πεπτικής υγείας; Παυσίπονα και αντιπυρετικά; Υπνωτικά και χαλαρωτικά; Βοηθήματα διακοπής καπνίσματος; Τοπικές θεραπείες δέρματος
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Медицина и лекарства: Лекарства за алергия и сенна хрема; Лекарства за кашлица, настинка и грип; Лекарства за храносмилателно здраве; Болкоуспокояващи и температуропонижаващи средства; Средства за сън и релаксация; Средства за отказ от тютюнопушене; Локални средства за лечение на кожа
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Gyógyszerek: Allergia- és szénanáthagyógyszerek; Köhögés-, megfázás- és influenzagyógyszerek; Emésztőrendszeri gyógyszerek; Fájdalomcsillapítók és lázcsillapítók; Altatók és nyugtatók; Dohányzásról leszokást segítő készítmények; Helyi bőrkezelések